California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
-------------------------------------------

76112.

This chapter, except as necessary to conduct an implementation referendum vote, shall not become operative until the director finds, in a referendum conducted by the director, that at least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the director pursuant to this article participated and that either of the following occurred.

(a) Sixty-five percent or more of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of the provisions of this chapter, and the producers so voting marketed a majority of the total quantity of cherries in the preceding season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(b) A majority of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of the provisions of this chapter, and the producers so voting marketed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of cherries in the preceding season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 56.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76113.

(a) The director shall establish a period in which to conduct the referendum which shall not be less than 10 days nor more than 60 days in duration, and may prescribe additional procedures as may be necessary to conduct the referendum.

(b) If the initial period established is less than 60 days, the director may extend the period. However, the total referendum period may not exceed 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76114.

Nonreceipt of a ballot shall not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76115.

If the director finds that a favorable vote has been given as provided in this article, he or she shall certify and declare this chapter operative and give notice of the favorable vote to all producers whose names and addresses are on file with the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 57.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76116.

If the director finds that a favorable vote has not been given as provided in this article, he or she shall so certify and declare that this chapter is not operative. The director may conduct another implementation referendum vote one year or more after the previous vote has been taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 58.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76117.

Upon certification of the commission, the director shall contact, by mail, every producer and grower-handler in each district and every shipper or shall call meetings of producers and grower-handlers in each district for the purpose of nominating and electing persons for appointment to the commission . All producers, grower-handlers, and shippers on the director’s list shall be given written notice of any meeting at least 15 days prior to the meeting date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 59.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76118.

To be eligible for election to the commission, producer, grower-handler, and shipper nominees must present to the director a nomination petition with signatures of at least six eligible producers, grower-handlers, or shippers from the district from which the nominee is seeking election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76119.

Subsequent to the first election of members of the commission pursuant to this chapter, persons to be elected to the commission shall be selected pursuant to the nomination and election procedures established by the commission with the concurrence of the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 60.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76120.

(a) Prior to the referendum vote conducted by the director pursuant to this article, the proponents of the commission shall deposit with the director any amounts that the director may deem necessary to defray the expenses of preparing the necessary lists and information and conducting the vote. Any funds not used in carrying out the provisions of this article shall be returned to the proponents of the commission who deposited the funds with the director.

(b) Upon establishment of the commission, the commission is authorized to reimburse the proponents of the commission for any funds deposited with the director which were used in carrying out the provisions of this article, and for any legal expenses and costs incurred in establishing the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 61.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Assessments and Records [76141. - 76148.]

76141.

(a) The commission shall, not later than April 20 of each year, establish the assessment for the following marketing season, which shall not exceed fifteen cents ($0.15) per 18-pound container or its equivalent in volume in fresh shipping cherries, or three-tenths of one cent ($0.003) per pound for processing cherries.

(b) A fee greater than that specified in subdivision (a) may be charged only if approved by producers pursuant to Section 76112.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 62.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76142.

This chapter does not apply to cherries produced for the producer’s home use, to cherries used only for ornamental purposes, or to cherries grown on land totaling one acre or less by a person who is not a producer for purposes of this chapter. However, a person subject to this section shall file an affidavit with the commission establishing that his or her cherries are exempt from this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 63.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76143.

(a) Every processor, shipper, and grower-handler shall keep a complete and accurate record of all cherries processed, shipped, or grower handled by him or her, with the name of the producer whose cherries were processed, shipped, or handled. The records shall be in simple form and contain any information that the commission prescribes.

(b) The records shall be kept by the processor, shipper, or grower-handler for a period of two years and offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon written demand of the commission or its duly authorized agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76144.

All proprietary information obtained by the commission or the director from producers, processors, shippers, or grower-handlers is confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required in a judicial proceeding. Information on volume shipments, crop value, and any other related information which is required for reports to governmental agencies, financial reports to the commission, or aggregate sales and inventory information, and any other such information which the processors, shippers, or grower-handlers request from the commisson to receive in total, excluding the individual processor, shipper, or grower-handler information, may be disclosed to the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76145.

Assessments shall be upon the producer. The first shipper, grower-handler, or processor of cherries being assessed shall deduct the assessment from amounts paid by him or her to the producer, and shall be a trustee of the funds until they are paid to the commission at the time and in the manner prescribed by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 64.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76146.

Every processor, shipper, and grower-handler is personally liable for the payment of the collected assessments, and failure of the processor, shipper or grower-handler to collect the assessment from any producer shall not exempt any processor, shipper, or grower-handler from liability for these funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76147.

Any assessment which is levied as provided for in this chapter, is a personal debt of every producer so assessed. Failure of a processor, shipper, or grower-handler to collect the assessment does not relieve the producer of the obligation to pay the assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 65.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76148.

Any producer, processor, shipper, or grower-handler who fails to file a return or pay any assessment within the time required by the commission shall pay to the commission a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of such assessment determined to be due and, in addition, one and one-half percent interest per month on the unpaid balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Actions and Penalties [76161. - 76163.]

76161.

It is unlawful to do any of the following:

(a) Willfully render or furnish a false report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(b) When engaged in the shipping, processing or handling of cherries, or in the wholesale or retail trade of cherries, to fail or refuse to furnish the commission or its duly authorized agents, upon request, information concerning the name and address of the persons from whom cherries have been received and the quantity received.

(c) Secrete, destroy, or alter records required to be kept under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 66.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76162.

The commission shall establish procedures for the purpose of according individuals aggrieved by its actions or determinations an informal hearing before the commission, or before a committee of the commission designated for this purpose. Appeals from decisions of the commission may be made to the director. The determination of the director shall be subject to judicial review upon petition of the superior court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76163.

(a) The commission may commence civil actions and utilize all remedies provided in law or equity for the collection of assessments and civil penalties, and for the obtaining of injunctive relief or specific performance, respecting this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted under this chapter.

(b) A court shall issue to the commission any requested writ of attachment or injunctive relief upon a prima facie showing by verified complaint that a named defendant has violated this chapter or any rule or regulation of the commission, including, but not limited to, the nonpayment of assessments. No bond shall be required to be posted by the commission as a condition for the issuance of any writ of attachment or injunctive relief. A writ of attachment shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing required by Section 485.010 is not required. Injunctive relief shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing of irreparable harm or of inadequate remedy at law specified by Sections 526 or 527 is not required.

(c) Upon entry of any final judgment on behalf of the commission against any defendant, the court shall enjoin the defendant from conducting any type of business regarding the commodity subject to this chapter until there is full compliance with and satisfaction of the judgment.

(d) Upon a favorable verdict for the commission, the commission may receive reimbursement for any reasonable attorney’s fees and other actual related costs. Venue for these actions may be established at the domicile or place of business of the defendant or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 67.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Continuation or Suspension and Termination [76181. - 76185.]

76181.

Except as otherwise specified in this article, the commission shall cause a referendum to be conducted among producers pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 76111) every five years following implementation of this chapter to determine whether the operation of this chapter is reapproved and shall be continued in effect. The vote shall be declared in favor of continuation if the director determines from the referendum that a majority of the eligible producers voting in the referendum voted to continue the operation of this chapter. If the director finds that a favorable vote has been given, he or she shall so certify and all provisions of this chapter shall remain effective. If the director finds that a favorable vote has not been given, he or she shall so certify and declare the operation of the provisions of this chapter and the commission suspended upon expiration of the marketing season ending December 31, 1990. Thereupon, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and funds distributed in the manner provided in Section 76184. No bond or security shall be required for any such referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 68.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76182.

If a referendum is conducted as the result of a petition pursuant to Section 76183, it shall be conducted every fifth year following the industry petitioned referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 69.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76183.

Upon a finding by a two-thirds vote of the commission that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes, the commission may recommend to the director that the operation of this chapter be suspended. No suspension shall become effective until the expiration of the current marketing season. The director shall, upon receipt of the recommendation, or may, after a public hearing to review a petition filed with him or her requesting the suspension, signed by 20 percent of the producers by number who produced not less than 20 percent of the volume in the immediately preceding season, cause a referendum to be conducted among the producers to determine if the operation of this chapter shall be suspended. However, the director shall not cause a referendum to be conducted as a result of the petition unless the petitioner shows by the weight of evidence that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes. The director shall establish a referendum period, which shall not be less than 10 nor more than 60 days in duration. The director may prescribe any additional procedures that may be necessay to conduct the referendum. At the close of the established referendum period, the director shall tabluate the ballots filed during the period. If at least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the director participate in the referendum, the director shall suspend the operation of this chapter, if he or she finds either one of the following has occurred:

(a) Sixty-five percent or more of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the producers so voting marketed a majority of the total quantity of cherries marketed in the preceding marketing seasons by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(b) A majority of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the producers so voting marketed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of cherries marketed in the preceding season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 70.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76183.5.

(a) The director shall terminate the commission at the end of the current marketing season if requested in writing, within a 90-day period, by at least 51 percent of the eligible producers who are directly affected and who produce at least 51 percent of the volume of the product.

(b) The person or persons originating the request shall file a written notice with the director in a manner that establishes the date a request is initiated. Any person may withdraw his or her name for the petition requesting the termination prior to the time the request is presented to the director. The signatures to the petition requesting the termination need not all be appended to one sheet of paper. Each person signing the petition shall add to his or her signature his or her place of business, giving the street and number. If no street and number exist, then a designation of the place of business shall be given which will enable the location to be readily ascertained.

(c) The petition shall bear a copy of the notice of intention. Signatures shall be secured within the time limit specified in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 70.5.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76184.

After the effective date of suspension of the operation of this chapter, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and any and all moneys remaining held by the commission, collected by assessments and not required to defray the expenses of concluding and terminating operations of the commission, shall be returned upon a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding current marketing season. However, if the commission finds that the amounts so returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of the pro rata refund to these persons, any such moneys remaining and any moneys remaining after payment of all expenses of winding up and terminating operations shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid into the University of California for continued research on cherries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 71.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76185.

Upon suspension of the operation of this chapter and of the commission, the commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to all producers affected by the suspension whose names and addresses are on file.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. California Sheep Commission [76201. - 76384.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration and General Provisions [76201. - 76207.]

76201.

The production, slaughtering, manufacturing and distributing of sheep and wool, and the products derived therefrom constitute an important industry of this state which not only provides substantial and necessary revenues for the state and employment for its citizens, but also furnishes essential food and fiber vital to the public health and welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76202.

The maintenance and expansion of the sheep industry of California and of its local, national, and foreign markets, is necessary to assure the consuming public of a continuous supply of the vital food and fiber, and the maintenance of needed levels of income for those engaged in the sheep industry of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76203.

It is necessary for human nutrition and public benefit that the public be made aware of accurate and scientific information relative to the beneficial qualities of sheep, wool, and the products derived therefrom, and the values and uses thereof, and of the production and distribution costs necessary to make sheep, wool, and the products derived therefrom, available to the consuming public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76204.

The production and marketing of sheep, wool, and the products derived therefrom, produced in this state is hereby declared to be affected with a public interest. This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76205.

No action taken by the commission, nor by any individual in accordance with this chapter or with the rules and regulations adopted under the chapter, is a violation of the so-called Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Fair Trade Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16900) of that Part 2), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of that Part 2), or any statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76205.5.

This chapter shall be liberally construed. If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter, which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76206.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that members of the commission are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular agricultural industry concerned, and that this representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are appointed to the commission, the particular agricultural industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76207.

A commission form of administration created by this chapter is designed to deal with the broad fields of advertising, promotion, marketing research, production research, and protection of sheep.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [76221. - 76233.]

76221.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76222.

“Sheep” means, but is not limited to rams, ewes, wethers, and lambs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76223.

“Books and records” means books, records, contracts, documents, memoranda, papers, correspondence, or other written data pertaining to matters relating to the activities subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76224.

“Commission” means the California Sheep Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76225.

“Commissioner” means any member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76226.

“Districts” shall consist of the following:

(a) District 1 consists of the Counties of Del Norte, Humboldt, Mendocino, and Lake.

(b) District 2 consists of the Counties of Sonoma, Napa, and Marin.

(c) District 3 consists of the Counties of Siskiyou, Trinity, Tehama, Modoc, Lassen, Plumas, and Shasta.

(d) District 4 consists of the Counties of Glenn, Colusa, Butte, and Yolo.

(e) District 5 consists of the County of Solano.

(f) District 6 consists of the Counties of Sierra, Sutter, Yuba, Sacramento, El Dorado, Placer, and Nevada.

(g) District 7 consists of the Counties of Calaveras, Amador, San Joaquin, Stanislaus, Tuolumne, Alpine, Alameda, Contra Costa, Santa Clara, and San Mateo, and the City and County of San Francisco.

(h) District 8 consists of the Counties of Merced, Monterey, Mariposa, Santa Cruz, San Luis Obispo, San Benito, and Madera.

(i) District 9 consists of the Counties of Fresno, Kings, and Tulare.

(j) District 10 consists of the Counties of Kern, Mono, and Inyo.

(k) District 11 consists of the Counties of Los Angeles, Imperial, San Diego, San Bernardino, Riverside, Santa Barbara, Ventura, and Orange.

The boundaries of any district may be changed by a two-thirds vote of the commission, which is concurred in by the director, when necessary to maintain similar total production among the districts and to ensure proper representation by producers. These boundaries need not coincide with county lines.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76227.

“Handler” means any person engaged in the marketing of wool which he or she has produced or purchased or acquired from a producer, or is marketing on behalf of a producer whether as owner, agent, employee, broker or otherwise. A producer who markets wool to an out-of-state handler shall be considered the handler for purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 397, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

76227.5.

“Market” means to sell, ship, distribute, or otherwise handle wool.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76228.

“Marketing research” means any research relating to the marketing of sheep, wool, and the products derived therefrom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76229.

“Marketing year” or “fiscal year” means the period beginning April 1 of any year and ending March 31 of the following year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 397, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

76230.

“Producer” means any person in this state who raises, breeds, grows, or feeds sheep, and markets, or causes to be marketed, the wool derived therefrom and who, upon request, provides proof of commodity marketing during the preceding marketing year. “Producer” does not include any person who markets 100 pounds or less of wool in the preceding marketing year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 397, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

76231.

“Production research” means any research relating to the production of sheep, wool, and the products derived therefrom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76232.

“Ex officio member” means a nonvoting member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76233.

(a) “Wool” means the shorn fiber of live sheep in the grease basis, including offsort wool or offsorts in the natural state before cleaning or scouring.

(b) For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Offsort wool or offsorts” means tags, bellies, or crutchings.

(2) “Tags” means wool which has become discolored from urine or feces, dung locks, or floor sweepings.

(3) “Bellies” means wool which has been shorn from the belly of the sheep.

(4) “Crutchings” means wool which has been shorn from the crotch area of a sheep.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 397, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The California Sheep Commission [76251. - 76265.]

76251.

(a) There is in the state government the California Sheep Commission. The commission shall be composed of 13 sheep producers and one public member. Producers within districts 1 to 9, inclusive, shall each elect one producer to serve on the commission. Producers within districts 10 and 11 shall each elect two producers to serve on the commission.

(b) The public member shall be appointed to the commission by the director from nominees recommended by the commission.

(c) The director and other appropriate individuals, as determined by the commission, shall be ex officio members of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76252.

(a) The director may require the commission to correct or cease any existing activity or function which is determined by the director not to be in the public interest or which is in violation of this chapter.

(b) If the commission refuses or fails to cease these activities or functions or to make these corrections as required by the director, the director may, upon written notice, suspend all or a portion of the activities or functions of the commission until the time that the cessation or correction of activities or functions as required by the director has been accomplished by the commission.

(c) Actions of the commission in violation of the written notice are without legal force or effect. The director, to the extent feasible, shall issue the written notice prior to the commission entering into any contractual relationship affecting the existing or proposed activities or functions which are the subject of the written notice.

(d) Upon service of the written notice, the director shall notify the commission in writing of the specific acts which he or she determines are not in the public interest or are in violation of this chapter, his or her reasons for requiring a cessation or correction of specific existing or proposed activities or functions, and he or she may make recommendations that will make the activities or functions acceptable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76253.

The commission or the director may bring an action for judicial relief from the director’s written notice, or from noncompliance by the commission with the written notice, as the case may be, in a court of competent jurisdiction, which may issue a temporary restraining order, permanent injunction, or other applicable relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76254.

When the director is required to concur in a decision of the commission, he or she shall indicate his or her response to the commission within 15 working days from notification of the decision. The response may be a request that additional information be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76255.

The commission shall reimburse the director for all expenditures incurred by the director in carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities pursuant to this chapter. However, the court may, if it finds that the director acted arbitrarily or capriciously in restricting the activities or functions of the commission, relieve the commission of the responsibility for payment of the director’s legal costs with regard to that action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76256.

Each member of the commission, except the ex officio members, shall have an alternate member to be elected in the same manner as the member. An alternate member shall, in the absence of the member for whom he or she is an alternate, serve in place of the member on the commission, and shall have and be able to exercise all the rights, privileges, and powers of the member when serving on the commission. In the event of death, removal, resignation, or disqualification of a member, the alternate shall act as a member on the commission until a successor is elected and has qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76257.

Any vacancy on the commission occurring by the failure of any person elected to the commission as a member or alternate member to continue in his or her position due to a change in status, making him or her ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal, or resignation, shall be filled, for the unexpired portion of the term, by a majority vote of the commission. That person shall fulfill all the qualifications set forth in this article as required for the member whose office he or she is to fill.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76257.5.

Any producer member or his or her alternate on the commission shall be an individual or an employee representing a producer who has a financial interest in producing, or causing to be produced, wool for market. The qualifications of a producer member and an alternate producer member shall be maintained during the entire term of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76258.

The public member or his or her alternate on the commission, shall have all the powers, rights, and privileges of any other member on the commission. The public member shall not have any financial interest in the sheep or wool industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76259.

The term of office of all members of the commission, except ex officio members, shall be two years from the date of their election and until their successors are qualified. However, of the first members of the commission, one-half of the producers shall serve for one year, and one-half of the producers shall serve for two years, with the determination of the term of each such member made by lot at the time of the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 260, Sec. 10.   (AB 1894)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

76260.

The commission shall be and is hereby declared and created a corporate body. It shall have the power to sue and be sued, to contract and be contracted with, and to have and possess all of the powers of a corporation. It may adopt a corporate seal. Copies of its proceedings, records, and acts, when authenticated, shall be admissible in evidence in all courts of the state and shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76261.

A quorum of the commission shall be eight voting members of the commission. Except as provided in Sections 76226 and 76382.5, the vote of a majority of members present at a meeting at which there is a quorum shall constitute the act of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76262.

The director or his or her representatives shall be notified and may attend each meeting of the commission and any committee meeting of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76263.

No member of the commission or member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission shall receive a salary. Each member of the commission, except ex officio government members, and each member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission, may receive a sum not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day, as established by the commission. This per diem shall be paid to members for each day spent in actual attendance at, or in traveling to and from, meetings of the commission or committees of the commission, or on special assignment for the commission, as approved by the commission. Members shall also receive the necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances, as approved by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76264.

All funds received by any person from the assessments levied under the authority of this chapter or otherwise received by the commission shall be deposited in banks which the commission may designate and shall be disbursed by order of the commission through an agent or agents as it may designate for that purpose. The agent or agents shall be bonded by a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state, in favor of the commission, in the amount of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76265.

The state is not liable for the acts of the commission or its contracts. Payments of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the commission are limited to the funds collected by the commission. No member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, is personally liable for the contracts of the commission. No member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, is responsible individually in any way to any producer, processor, handler, or any other person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, or employee, except for his or her own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, is responsible individually for any act or omission of any other member of the commission. Liability is several and not joint, and no member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, is liable for the default of any other member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of the Commission [76281. - 76298.]

76281.

The powers and duties of the commission shall include, but are not limited to, all of those contained in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76282.

The commission may adopt and from time to time alter, rescind, modify, and amend all proper and necessary bylaws, rules, regulations, operating procedures, and orders for carrying out this chapter, including rules for appeals from any bylaw, rule, regulation, operating procedure, or order of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76283.

The commission may administer and enforce this chapter and to do and perform all acts and exercise all powers incidental to, or in connection with, or deemed reasonably necessary for proper or advisable effectuation of this chapter. The commission’s authority includes, but is not limited to, entering into contracts for services with public and private agencies which are deemed necessary by the commission to carry out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76284.
